Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Kentucky Model Procurement Code
45A.460.
Recovery of value of anything transferred or received in breach of ethical standards.

The value of anything transferred or received in breach of the ethical standards of KRS

45A.345

to

45A.990

or regulations or rules issued thereunder by an employee or a nonemployee may be recovered from both the employee and the nonemployee.

Upon a showing that a subcontractor made a kickback to a prime contractor or a higher tier subcontractor in connection with the award of a subcontract or order thereunder, it shall be conclusively presumed that the amount thereof was included in the price of the subcontract or order and ultimately borne by the local public agency and will be recoverable hereunder from the recipient. In addition, said value may also be recovered from the subcontractor making such kickbacks. Recovery from one (1) offending party shall not preclude recovery against other offending parties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 93, effective January 1, 1980.

45A.465.
Definitions for KRS 45A.470.

As used in KRS

45A.470

, the words:

“Other individuals with severe disabilities” means an individual or class of individuals with a disability, other than blindness, that constitutes an obstacle to new or continued normal employment.

“Products” means programs, books, tapes, records, processes, packaging, modification, supplies, food, clothing, materials, commodities, equipment of all kinds, and any other article of commerce originally manufactured or assembled or purchased for resale by a qualified nonprofit agency.

“Qualified nonprofit agency for individuals with severe disabilities” means an organization that:

Is organized and operated in the interest of individuals with severe disabilities; and

Complies with any applicable occupational health and safety law of the United States and the Commonwealth; and

In the manufacture or provision of products or services listed or purchased under KRS

45A.470

, during the fiscal year employs individuals with severe disabilities for not less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the man hours of direct labor required for the manufacture or provision of the products or services; and

Is registered and in good standing as a nonprofit organization with the Secretary of State.

“Services” means contractual services; rental services of all kinds; professional, technical, or artistic services; and other personal performance of work by officers, employees, or beneficiaries of a nonprofit agency.

“State agency” means those spending agencies subject to the state purchasing requirements of this code and any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 170, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 496, § 30, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 405, § 9, effective July 15, 1994.

45A.470.
Preference to be given by governmental bodies and political subdivisions in purchasing commodities or services — List of commodities and services — Price range — Negotiation for identical products and services.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, all governmental bodies and political subdivisions of this state shall, when purchasing commodities or services, give first preference to the products made by the Department of Corrections, Division of Prison Industries, as required by KRS

197.210

. Second preference shall be given to any products produced by Kentucky Industries for the Blind, Incorporated, or any other nonprofit corporation that furthers the purposes of KRS Chapter 163, and agencies of individuals with severe disabilities as described in KRS

45A.465

.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall make a list of commodities and services provided by these agencies and organizations available to all governmental bodies and political subdivisions. The list shall identify in detail the commodity or service the agency or organization may supply and the price.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall annually determine the current price range for the commodities and services offered from its experience in purchasing these commodities or services on the open market. The prices quoted by these agencies or organizations shall not exceed the current price range.

The Office of Vocational Rehabilitation within the Education and Labor Cabinet and qualified agencies for individuals with severe disabilities shall annually cause to be made available to the Finance and Administration Cabinet, lists of the products or services available.

If two (2) or more of the agencies or qualified nonprofit organizations wish to supply identical commodities or services, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall conduct negotiations with the parties to determine which shall be awarded the contract. The decision of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be based upon quality of the commodity or service and the ability of the respective agencies to supply the commodity or service within the requested delivery time.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 170, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 331, § 13, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 126, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 209, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 405, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 393, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 211, § 11, effective April 21, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 10, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 162, § 24, effective July 15, 2010; 2019 ch. 146, § 6, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 236, § 19, effective July 1, 2022.

45A.475.
State depositories to render service pursuant to this chapter.

All services provided to the Commonwealth by qualified state depositories shall be rendered pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 24, effective July 15, 1982.

45A.480.
Compliance with workers’ compensation insurance and unemployment insurance laws required — Foreign entity to obtain certificate of authority — Penalty.

No state contract for building, construction, reconstruction, renovation, demolition, or maintenance, or for any activity related to building, construction, reconstruction, renovation, demolition, or maintenance shall be awarded by any agency, department, or office of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to any person until that person assures, by affidavit, that all contractors and subcontractors employed, or that will be employed, under the provisions of the contract shall be in compliance with Kentucky requirements for workers’ compensation insurance according to KRS Chapter 342 and unemployment insurance according to KRS Chapter 341.

An agency, department, office, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall not award a state contract to a person that is a foreign entity unless that foreign entity, on the records of the Secretary of State, holds a certificate of authority or a statement of foreign qualification.

Any person who fails to comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section during the term of the state contract, upon such finding by a court of competent jurisdiction, shall be fined an amount not to exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000), or an amount equal to the sum of uninsured and unsatisfied claims brought under the provisions of KRS Chapter 342 and unemployment insurance claims for which no wages were reported as required by KRS Chapter 341, whichever is greater.

The penalty imposed in subsection (2) of this section shall be enforced by the county attorney for the county in which the violation occurred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 174, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2011, ch. 80, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 81, § 86, effective July 12, 2012.

45A.485.
Certain contracts required to mandate revealing of violations of and compliance with specified KRS chapters — Effect of nondisclosure or noncompliance.

Any state contract awarded under KRS Chapter 45A, 175, 176, 177, or 180 after July 15, 1994, shall require the contractor and all subcontractors performing work under the contract to:

Reveal any final determination of a violation by their respective company within the previous five (5) year period pursuant to KRS Chapters 136, 139, 141, 337, 338, 341, and 342 that apply to the contractor or subcontractor; and

Be in continuous compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 136, 139, 141, 337, 338, 341, and 342 that apply to the contractor or subcontractor for the duration of the contract.

A contractor’s failure to reveal a final determination of a violation by the contractor of KRS Chapters 136, 139, 141, 337, 338, 341, and 342 or to comply with these statutes for the duration of the contract shall be grounds for the Commonwealth’s:

Cancellation of the contract; and

Disqualification of the contractor from eligibility for future state contracts for a period of two (2) years.

A subcontractor’s failure to reveal a final determination of a violation by the subcontractor of KRS Chapters 136, 139, 141, 337, 338, 341, and 342 or to comply with these statutes for the duration of the contract shall be grounds for the Commonwealth’s disqualification of the subcontractor from eligibility for future state contracts for a period of two (2) years.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 491, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 520, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.487.
Definitions for KRS 45A.487 and 45A.488.

“Public agency” as used in KRS

45A.487

and

45A.488

has the same meaning as KRS

61.870

.

“Public works” as used in KRS

45A.487

and

45A.488

means all buildings, roads, streets, alleys, sewers, ditches, sewage disposal plants, waterworks, and all other structures or work, including “adult correctional facilities,” as defined in KRS

197.500

, constructed under contract with any public agency.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 38, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

45A.488.
Restrictions on requirements relating to labor organizations in bid specifications and other contract documents — Grants, tax abatements, and tax credits — Exemption for threat to public health or safety.

A public agency awarding a contract for a public works project shall not in the bid specifications, project agreements, or other contract documents:

Require or give preference to a bidder, offeror, or contractor in any contractor tier to enter into or adhere to an agreement with a labor organization relating to the public works contract or any other public works project; or

Prohibit a bidder, offeror, or contractor in any contractor tier from entering into or adhering to an agreement with a labor organization relating to the public works project or any other public works project.

A public agency shall not award a grant, tax abatement, or tax credit that is conditioned upon a requirement that a person awarded the grant, tax abatement, or tax credit include a term described in subsection (1) of this section in a contract document for any public works project that is the subject of the grant, tax abatement, or tax credit.

This section does not do any of the following:

Prohibit a public agency from awarding a contract, grant, tax abatement, or tax credit to a private owner, bidder, or contractor in any contractor tier who is party to an agreement with a labor organization if being or becoming a party or adhering to an agreement with a labor organization is not a condition for award of the contract, grant, tax abatement, or tax credit;

Prohibit a contractor in any contractor tier from voluntarily entering into or complying with an agreement entered into with a labor union in regard to a contract with a public agency or funded in whole or in part from a grant, tax abatement, or tax credit from a public agency;

Prohibit employers or other parties from entering into agreements or engaging in any other activity protected by the National Labor Relations Act, 29

U.S.C. secs. 151

et seq.; or

Interfere with labor relations of parties that are not regulated under the National Labor Relations Act, 29

U.S.C. secs. 151

et seq.

A public agency may exempt a particular project, contract in any contractor tier, grant, tax abatement, or tax credit from the requirements of any or all of the provisions of this section if the public agency finds, after public notice and hearing, that special circumstances require an exemption to avert an imminent threat to public health or safety. A finding of special circumstances under this subsection may not be based on the possibility or presence of a labor dispute concerning:

The use of contractors at any contractor tier who are not signatories to, or otherwise do not adhere to, agreements with one (1) or more labor organizations; or

Employees on the project who are not members of, or affiliated with, a labor organization.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 38, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.